Hawaii, session 2025, GM1398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1, The legislature finds that the State is facing
a housing shortage. A 2019 study cominissioned by the department
of business, economic development, and tourism found that, using
high scenario projections, the State will require an additional
46,573 homes by the year 2030, with the city and county of
Honolulu requiring 21,392 new units; Hawaii county requiring
13,527 new units; Maui county requiring 8,515 new units; and
Kauai county requiring 3,138 new units.
The legislature further finds that some of the largest
obstacles for developers to construct more housing in the State
are:
(1) A lack of areas with proper zoning to allow for the
construction of residential dwellings;
(2) A lack of infrastructure to support newly developed
residential dwellings; and
(3) Delays in the issuance of building permits for
single-family and multi-family projects.
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx
iiiiniimHiiiMiiiiii

Page 2
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The building permit processing times for single-family and
multi-family projects vary tremendously across the United
States. However, the counties in Hawaii have some of the
longest processing times for residential building permits. An
April 2022 study prepared by the university of Hawaii economic
research organization found that, on average, Hawaii
homebuilders wait three times longer for permits than those in
other states, which drives up costs significantly and creates
uncertainty, serving as a disincentive to build new projects.
Furthermore, the study found that compared to the most regulated
markets in the country, Hawaii's permit delays are almost two
times longer, meaning it can take from one year to one and a
half years for a permit to be approved.
The legislature also finds that lengthy processing times to
obtain'a building permit raises questions about what information
is necessary for counties when processing building permit
applications. The basic responsibilities of the counties are to
ensure compliance with various building codes and ensure
adequate infrastructure capacity to support the proposed project
or development. Although it is the counties' responsibility to
monitor for compliance with various building codes, if the
2025-2756 SB66 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 3 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
construction plans do not satisfy these codes and are not
corrected before construction, the designer, who is a licensed
professional who stamped the plans, and the contractor are
ultimately responsible. The counties are also not typically
involved in litigation as the building permit process is
ministerial, mainly to check for code compliance.
In other municipalities around the country, building plans
are not scrutinized to the extent that they are in Hawaii
counties. In Hawaii, the plan review is to ensure that the
design meets all applicable codes. However, in other
municipalities, the plans are used as a guide while code
compliance verification is completed upon inspection of the
project during construction. Inspectors who find that
construction does not satisfy the code either have the
correction made in the field or stop construction until proper
corrective actions have been taken to ensure that new
construction meets the code. Ultimately, the designer and
contractor are responsible for ensuring new construction meets
all applicable codes.
2025-2756 SB66 GDI SMA-l.docx 3
iiuliilimimiiiiiniii

Page 4 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish
procedures and requirements for single-family and multi-family
homes to apply for an expedited permit until June 30, 2031.
SECTION 2. Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
read as follows:
"§46- Expedited permits; single-family and multi-family
housing project permit applications; review time eligibility.
(a) Permit applications for single-family and multi-family
housing projects in each county shall be eligible for an
expedited permit approval pursuant to this section.
(b) An applicant or the applicant's agent may submit a
request to the county for an expedited permit if sixty business
days have lapsed after the application was considered complete
by the relevant agency and the application has not received full
approval by the county. The request by the applicant or the
applicant's agent shall include:
(1) A full and complete set of plans;
Statements or evidence from the relevant permitting
agencies that adequate infrastructure capacity is
2025-2756 SB66 GDI SMA-l.docx

Page 5 S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
available to service the project site and specified
improvements;
(3) The following information from all licensed
professionals on record:
(A) Policies of insurance that:
(i) Name the State and county as additional
insurers;
(ii) Are in amounts equivalent to at least
$2,000,000; and
(iii) Specifically allow coverage for the
completed project for the period under
section 657-8; and
A statement that indemnifies and holds harmless
the State, its officers, agents, and employees
and the county, its officers, agents, and
employees;
(4) A statement that sixty business days have lapsed
without approval since the application would have been
considered complete by the relevant agency; and
(5) The required county contractor's statement.
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 5

Page 6 S.B. NO.
3^-
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(c) For the purposes of subsection (b), applications shall
only be considered complete if;
(1) Either;
Qualified professionals who meet state historic
preservation division rules governing
professional qualifications for architecture,
archaeology, architectural history, or physical
anthropology have made a reasonable and
good-faith determination that the project does
not have the potential to affect historic
properties, archaeological resources, or burial
sites; or
(B) The project has been submitted to the state
historic preservation division of the department
of land and natural resources and the chapter 6E
process has been completed, including for those
situations in which the county professional
described in subparagraph (A) determines that the
project may have the potential to affect historic
properties, archaeological resources, or burial
sites;
2025-2756 SB66 GDI SMA-l.docx 6

Page 7 S.B. NO. --
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
(2) The applicant submits documentation evidencing that
the proposed project does not encroach on special
flood hazard areas identified as "A” or "V" zones on
the Federal Emergency Management Agency's Flood
S Insurance Rate Maps, or the applicable county official
has reviewed the proposed project for floodplain
management compliance and has issued a development
permit for construction;
(3) The project is not higher than thirty feet;
(4) The project is not situated on a shoreline parcel or a
parcel that is impacted by waves, storm waves, high
tide, or shoreline erosion and is in compliance with
all laws, rules, and procedures pursuant to chapter
205A;
(5) All plans and specifications submitted to a county
have been stamped by a duly licensed structural,
civil, electrical, or mechanical engineer and licensed
professional, as applicable, certifying compliance
with the applicable building codes for the respective
county; and
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 7

Page 8 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(6) Any other administrative criteria that the county
deems necessary to carry out the purpose of this
section.
If the county determines that the application is not complete,
the county shall notify the applicant and specify the
information needed to meet the requirements for complete
submittal under this subsection.
(d) For applications under section 444-2.5, the owner
listed on the application shall instead execute a waiver of all
claims against the State and county and execute a statement that
indemnifies and holds harmless the State, its officers, agents,
and employees and the county, its officers, agents, and
employees in lieu of subsection (b)(3). All expedited approval
requests by the applicant shall be reviewed for completeness by
the county within five days of submittal. For building permits
that apply for and meet the criteria for an expedited permit,
the county shall execute an agreement with the licensed
professional on record as assuming approval and oversight
responsibility for the permit application. Upon completion of
the agreement, the county shall consider the application
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 8

Page 9 S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
approved by the licensed professional^ issue an expedited
permit, and the applicant may proceed with construction.
(e) After approval, the licensed professional on record or
county shall ensure that the project construction is in
compliance with the approved plans under the expedited permit,
including but not limited to the requirements under chapter 6E
and all applicable ordinances regarding land use, set-back,
height, and site development requirements for the project site.
State and county inspectors shall not be precluded from entering
and inspecting project sites with expedited permits. Licensed
professionals and contractors shall address any defects in
construction identified by state or county inspectors; provided
that the defects in construction are consistent with the
specifications in the approved plans. If the defects are not
consistent with the approved plans, the licensed professional
shall note the disagreement and assume- review responsibility as
the approving authority or initiate a change to the plans to
address the defect. Consistent with the requirements and time
periods established by each county, all licensed contractors and
the licensed professional or the licensed contractors* or
licensed professional's successor agents shall maintain a record
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 9
■iilililMIUIIIIilM

Page 10 S.B. NO. --
C.D. 1
of inspected structural, civil, plumbing, and electrical systems
after a certificate of occupancy is issued and provide a copy of
that record to the applicant and the county.
(f) Upon completion of construction, the licensed
professional shall certify in writing to the county that a
certificate of occupancy is warranted and all laws, rules,
ordinances, and conditions governing permitted construction have
been met, along with any necessary as-built drawings consistent
with the requirements of each county. The county shall issue
the certificate to the applicant and may notate that the
certificate is approved by the licensed professional under an
agreement pursuant to an expedited permit, and not a county
official.
(g) Each county may adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 to
effectuate the purposes of this section and charge any necessary
fees, including defining what constitutes the sixty-day period,
which may exclude any time spent awaiting substantive responses
or revisions from the applicant necessary to address comments
issued during the review process.
(h) Nothing in this section shall be construed to allow
any violation of federal, state, or county laws, rules, or
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 1
llllllllllMlllinilllillllfUHt

Page 11 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
ordinances. The issuance of a certificate of occupancy shall
not be construed to limit or repeal any powers of any county to
enforce violations of any law, ordinance, or rule.”
SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026, and
shall be repealed on June 30, 2031.
2025-2756 SB66 CDl SMA-l.docx 11

S.B. NO 66
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 3rd day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI'I

S.B. No. 66, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 66, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives